Missouri, session 2026, SB1163.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 135.721, to read as
follows:
135.721. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Parental Choice Tax Credit Act".
2. For the purposes of this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of revenue;
(2) "Nonpublic school", any school that is not a part
of the public school system of the state of Missouri and
that renders elementary or secondary educational services,
regardless of whether such school charges tuition;
(3) "Qualified expenses":
(a) Tuition or fees at a nonpublic school;
(b) Textbooks required by a nonpublic school;
(c) Educational therapies or services from a licensed
or accredited practitioner or provider including, but not
limited to, licensed or accredited paraprofessionals or
educational aides;
(d) Tutoring services;
(e) Curriculum;

SB 1163 2
(f) Tuition or fees for a private virtual school;
(g) Fees for a nationally standardized norm-referenced
achievement test, advanced placement examinations, or any
examinations related to college or university admission;
(h) Fees for services provided by a public school
including, but not limited to, individual classes and
extracurricular programs;
(i) Computer hardware or other technological devices
that are used to help meet the qualified student's
educational needs;
(j) Fees for summer education programs and specialized
after-school education programs; and
(k) Transportation costs for mileage to and from a
nonpublic school.
"Qualified expenses" shall not include consumable
educational supplies including, but not limited to, paper,
pens, pencils, or markers; tuition at a private school
located outside of the state of Missouri; or payments or
reimbursements to any person related within the third degree
of consanguinity or affinity to a qualified student;
(4) "Qualified student", a child who is not enrolled
in a public school and who is required to be educated
pursuant to section 167.031;
(5) "Resident school district", the school district in
which a taxpayer's residence is located;
(6) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise
due under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed
under sections 143.191 to 143.265;
(7) "Taxpayer", any individual subject to the state
income tax imposed under chapter 143, excluding the

SB 1163 3
withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265,
and who:
(a) Enrolled a qualified student in a nonpublic school
during the tax year for which the taxpayer is claiming a tax
credit pursuant to this section; and
(b) Did not enroll a qualified student in the resident
school district during the tax year for which the taxpayer
is claiming a tax credit pursuant to this section.
3. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027, a taxpayer shall be authorized to claim a
tax credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability in an
amount equal to one hundred percent of qualified expenses
incurred for educating a qualified student at a nonpublic
school, provided that no tax credit authorized pursuant to
this section shall exceed the state adequacy target, as
defined in section 163.011.
(2) Tax credits authorized pursuant to this section
shall not be transferred, sold, or assigned.
(3) Any amount of tax credit that exceeds the
taxpayer's state tax liability shall be considered an
overpayment of taxes and shall be refunded.
(4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, no tax credit shall be issued pursuant to this
section for any qualified expenses that were paid for using
a Missouri empowerment scholarship account created pursuant
to sections 166.700 to 166.720.
4. Tax credits authorized pursuant to this section
shall be claimed by the taxpayer at the time such taxpayer
files a return.
5. The department shall promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is

SB 1163 4
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset six years after the effective
date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
100 sunset; and
101 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
102 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
103 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
104 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
105 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
106 section is sunset.
✓